Washington statutes.
RCW 43.390.030

Equitable access to credit program account.

The equitable access to credit program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from contributions to the equitable access to credit program created by this chapter must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the award of grants to qualified lending institutions from the equitable access to credit program and administrative costs pursuant to RCW 43.390.020. Only the director of the department of commerce or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Any funds remaining in the account upon the expiration of this chapter must be transferred to the state general fund.

[ 2022 c 189 s 4.]